sl-SI: Vrsta tetivnega konca: Zajemno; Natakljivo; Ploščato; Polmesec; Osvetljeno; Omni-nock; Zatič; Stisno; Pritisno; Zaskočno; Drugo
it: Tipo di cocca: Ad aggancio; A incastro esterno; Piatto; A mezzaluna; Luminoso; Omni-Nock; Pin; Inserimento a pressione; A spinta; A scatto; Altro
de: Nockentyp: Capture; Fit-over; Flach; Halbmond; Beleuchtet; Omni-Nock; Pin; Press-fit; Push-in; Snap-on; Sonstiges
vi: Loại mũi tên: Dạng kẹp; Bọc ngoài; Phẳng; Bán nguyệt; Có đèn; Omni-nock; Dạng chốt; Lắp ép; Ấn vào; Dạng bấm; Khác
nb: Nock-type: Capture; Træ over; Flat; Halvmåne; Belyst; Omni-nock; Pinne; Presspassform; Innstikk; Klikk-på; Annet
lt-LT: Strėlės antgalio tipas: Fiksuojantis; Užmaunamas; Plokščias; Pusmėnulio formos; Šviečiantis; „Omni-nock“; Smeigė; Įspaudžiamas; Įstumiamas; Užspaudžiamas; Kita
pl: Typ nocka: Typu capture; Nakładana; Płaska; Półksiężycowa; Podświetlana; Omni-nock; Typu pin; Wciskana; Wtykowa; Zatrzaskowa; Inne
fi: Nokkityyppi: Capture; Päälle asennettava; Tasainen; Puolikuu; Valaistu; Omni-nock; Tappi; Puristussovite; Painettava; Napsautettava; Muu
sk-SK: Typ končíka: Záchytné; Nasúvacie; Ploché; Polmesiac; Osvetlené; Omni-nock; Čapové; Lisované; Zasúvacie; Nacvakávacie; Iné
ko: 노크 유형: 캡처; 핏오버; 플랫; 반달형; 발광형; 옴니 노크; 핀; 프레스핏; 푸시인; 스냅온; 기타
zh-TW: 箭尾類型: 夾弦式; 套入式; 平底式; 半月式; 發光式; 全向式; 插針式; 壓入式; 推入式; 卡扣式; 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta udubljenja: Zadržavanje; Navlačenje; Ravno; Polumjesec; Osvijetljeno; Omni-nock; Iglica; Utiskivanje; Guranje; Kopčanje; Ostalo
bg-BG: Тип нок: Захващащ; Нахлузващ се; Плосък; Полумесец; Светещ; Omni-nock; Щифт; За пресоване; За вмъкване; За щракване; Друго
sv: Nocktyp: Fångnock; Träs över; Platt; Halvmåne; Belyst; Omni-nock; Pin; Presspassning; Push-in; Snap-on; Övrigt
da: Nocktype: Capture; Fit-over; Flad; Halvmåne; Med lys; Omni-nock; Pin; Press-fit; Push-in; Snap-on; Andet
el: Τύπος εγκοπής: Συγκράτησης; Επικάλυψης; Επίπεδη; Μισοφέγγαρο; Φωτιζόμενη; Omni-nock; Καρφίτσα; Πρεσαριστή; Ώθησης; Κουμπωτή; Άλλο
fr: Type d’encoche: À capture; À emboîter; Plat; Demi-lune; Lumineux; Omni-Nock; À broche; À ajustement serré; À insérer; À clipser; Autre
ru: Тип хвостовика: Захватный; Надевающийся; Плоский; Полумесяц; Светящийся; Omni-nock; Пин; Запрессованный; Вставной; Защелкивающийся; Другое
pt-PT: Tipo de nock: Captura; Sobreposição; Plano; Meia-lua; Iluminado; Omni-nock; Pino; Encaixe por pressão; De empurrar; De mola; Outro
zh-CN: 箭尾类型: 全包式; 套筒式; 平底; 半月形; 发光; 全方位箭尾; 插针式; 压配式; 推入式; 卡扣式; 其他
tr: Ok kuyruğu tipi: Kavramalı; Geçmeli; Düz; Yarım ay; Işıklı; Omni-nock; Pimli; Sıkı geçmeli; İtmeli; Çıtçıtlı; Diğer
ja: ノックタイプ: キャプチャー; フィットオーバー; フラット; ハーフムーン; 発光式; オムニノック; ピン; 圧入式; プッシュイン; スナップオン; その他
cs: Typ končíku: Zajišťovací (capture); Nasazovací (fit-over); Plochý; Půlměsíc; Svítící; Omni-Nock; Čep (pin); Nalisovací; Zasunovací; Nacvakávací; Ostatní
pt-BR: Nock tipo: Captura; De sobrepor; Plano; Meia lua; Luminoso; Omni-nock; Pino; Encaixe por pressão; De empurrar; De encaixe rápido; Outro
en: Nock type: Capture; Fit-over; Flat; Half-moon; Lighted; Omni-nock; Pin; Press-fit; Push-in; Snap-on; Other
hu: Nock típusa: Befogó; Rácsúsztatható; Lapos; Félhold; Világító; Omni-nock; Tű; Bepréselhető; Benyomható; Bepattintható; Egyéb
th: ประเภทน็อค: แบบกักเก็บ; สวมทับ; แบน; พระจันทร์ครึ่งเสี้ยว; มีไฟ; Omni-nock; พิน; อัดเข้าแบบพอดี; แบบดันเข้า; แบบกดล็อก; อื่นๆ
nl: Noktype: Capture; Fit-over; Plat; Halve maan; Verlicht; Omni-nock; Pin; Press-fit; Push-in; Snap-on; Anders
es: Tipo de culatín: De captura; Superpuesto; Plano; Media luna; Luminoso; Omni-nock; De pin; Ajuste a presión; De empuje; A presión; Otro
ro-RO: Tipul de crestătură: Cu fixare; Care se suprapune; Plat; Semilună; Iluminat; Omni-nock; Cu știft; Prin presare; Prin împingere; Cu prindere rapidă; Altele